Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.950

Final determination on state highway project permits.

A city or town must comply with the requirements of RCW 47.01.485 in making a final determination on a permit as part of a project on a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 15 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 47.01.485.